District of Columbia statutes.
49-409

President to be Commander-in-Chief.

The President of the United States shall be the Commander-in-Chief of the militia of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 773, ch. 328, § 6

History

1981 Ed., § 39-109.
1973 Ed., § 39-112.

Prior Codifications

Supervision and control of National Guard of District of Columbia: See Presidential Executive Order No. 11485, October 1, 1969, 34 F.R. 15411.

Editor's Notes